Maryland, session 2026, HB1563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1A–14.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Emergency medical condition” means a medical condition, including a
mental health condition or substance use disorder, that manifests itself by acute symptoms
of such severity, including severe pain, that the absence of immediate medical attention
could reasonably be expected by a prudent layperson, who possesses an average knowledge
of health and medicine, to result in a condition described in § 1867(e)(1) of the Social
Security Act.
(3) (i) “Emergency services” means, with respect to an emergency
medical condition:
1. a medical screening examination that is within the
capability of the emergency department of a hospital or freestanding medical facility,
including ancillary services routinely available to the emergency department to evaluate
an emergency medical condition;
2. any other examination or treatment within the
capabilities of the staff and facilities available at the hospital or freestanding medical
facility that is necessary to stabilize the patient, regardless of the department of the
hospital in which the examination or treatment is furnished; or
3. except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph,
additional covered items and services furnished by a health care provider of emergency
services that does not have a contractual relationship with the carrier after the patient is
stabilized and as part of outpatient observation or an inpatient or outpatient stay with
respect to the visit in which the services described in items 1 and 2 of this subparagraph
are furnished.
(ii) “Emergency services” includes services described in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph that are provided in specialized facilities that are staffed
by behavioral health providers trained to provide crisis services.
(iii) Subject to § 14–205.2 of this article and § 19–710(p) of the Health
– General Article, “emergency services” does not include items and services described in
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 165
subparagraph (i)3 of this paragraph if all of the conditions in 45 C.F.R. § 149.410(b) are
met.
(b) If a carrier provides or covers any benefits for emergency services in an
emergency department of a hospital or freestanding medical facility, the carrier:
(1) may not require prior authorization for the emergency services;
(2) shall provide coverage for the emergency services regardless of whether
the health care provider providing the emergency services has a contractual relationship
with the carrier to furnish emergency services;
(3) may not limit what constitutes an emergency medical condition solely
on the basis of diagnosis codes; and
(4) may not impose any other term or condition on the coverage for
emergency services, except for:
(i) the exclusion or coordination of benefits;
(ii) a waiting period; and
(iii) applicable cost–sharing.
(c) If a health care provider of emergency services does not have a contractual
relationship with the carrier to provide emergency services, the carrier:
(1) may not impose any administrative requirement or limitation on
coverage that would be more restrictive than administrative requirements or limitations
imposed on coverage for emergency services furnished by a health care provider with a
contractual relationship with the carrier;
(2) subject to § 14–205.2 of this article and § 19–710.1 of the
Health – General Article, may not impose any cost–sharing amount greater than the
amount imposed for emergency services furnished by a health care provider with a
contractual relationship with the carrier;
(3) shall calculate and apply the cost–sharing amounts in accordance with
the requirements of 45 C.F.R. § 149.110(b)(3)(iii) and (v); and
(4) except as provided in § 14–205.2 of this article and § 19–710.1 of the
Health – General Article, shall reimburse the health care provider in accordance with the
requirements of 45 C.F.R. § 149.110(b)(3)(iv).
15–504.
– 3 –

Ch. 165 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
AN INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR BLANKET POLICY OR CONTRACT ISSUED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE BY AN INSURER, A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN,
OR A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT DENY A COVERED
EMERGENCY ROOM SERVICE SOLELY ON THE BASIS THAT THE INSURED OR
ENROLLEE DID NOT EXPERIENCE AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL CONDITION, AS DEFINED
IN § 15–1A–14 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–10A–06.
(a) (1) On a quarterly basis, each carrier shall submit to the Commissioner, on
the form the Commissioner requires, a report that describes the following information
aggregated by zip code as required by the Commissioner:
(i) the number of members entitled to health care benefits under a
policy, plan, or certificate issued or delivered in the State by the carrier;
(ii) the number of clean claims for reimbursement processed by the
carrier;
(iii) the activities of the carrier under this subtitle, including:
1. the outcome of each grievance filed with the carrier;
2. the number and outcomes of cases that were considered
emergency cases under § 15–10A–02(b)(2)(i) of this subtitle;
3. the time within which the carrier made a grievance
decision on each emergency case;
4. the time within which the carrier made a grievance
decision on all other cases that were not considered emergency cases;
5. the number of grievances filed with the carrier that
resulted from an adverse decision involving length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as
related to the medical procedure involved;
6. the number of adverse decisions issued by the carrier
under § 15–10A–02(f) of this subtitle, whether the adverse decision involved a prior
authorization or step therapy protocol, the type of service at issue in the adverse decisions,
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 165
and whether an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool was used in making
the adverse decision;
7. the number of adverse decisions overturned after a
reconsideration request under § 15–10B–06 of this title; and
8. the number of requests made and granted under §
15–831(c)(1) and (2) of this title; and
(iv) the number and outcome of all other cases that are not subject to
activities of the carrier under this subtitle that resulted from an adverse decision involving
the length of stay for inpatient hospitalization as related to the medical procedure involved.
(2) If the number of adverse decisions issued by a carrier for a type of
service has grown by 10% or more in the immediately preceding calendar year or 25% or
more in the immediately preceding 3 calendar years, the carrier shall submit in the report
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) a description of any changes in medical management
contributing to the rise in adverse decisions for the type of service;
(ii) any other known reasons for the increase; and
(iii) a description of the carrier’s efforts and actions taken to
determine the reason for the increase.
(b) The Commissioner shall:
(1) compile an annual summary report based on the information provided:
(i) under subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) by the Secretary under § 19–705.2(e) of the Health – General
Article;
(2) INCLUDE IN THE SUMMARY REPORT DATA ON ADVERSE DECISIONS
AND GRIEVANCES RELATED TO POST–ACUTE SERVICES, INCLUDING ADVERSE
DECISIONS AND GRIEVANCES RELATING TO ADMISSIONS TO SKILLED NURSING
FACILITIES AND INPATIENT REHABILITATION FACILITIES;
[(2)] (3) report any violations or actions taken under § 15–10B–11 of this
title; and
[(3)] (4) provide copies of the summary report to the Governor and,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly.
– 5 –

Ch. 165 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The Commissioner may use information provided under subsection (a) of this
section as the basis for an examination under Title 2, Subtitle 2 of this article.
15–10B–21.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER MAY CONDUCT AN EXAMINATION OF A CARRIER
THAT HAS ISSUED A PATTERN OF ADVERSE DECISIONS OR GRIEVANCE DECISIONS
FOR A CLAIM OR AUTHORIZATION REQUEST FOR SERVICES IN, OR RELATED TO
SERVICES IN, AN EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT.
(B) A CARRIER EXAMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
PRODUCE ALL DOCUMENTS RELATED TO AN ADVERSE DECISION OR GRIEVANCE
DECISION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
DOCUMENTS OR ELECTRONIC DOCUMENTS IN THE POSSESSION OF A PRIVATE
REVIEW AGENT ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE CARRIER.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSIONER MAY HAVE AN ADVERSE DECISION OR
GRIEVANCE DECISION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
REVIEWED BY AN INDEPENDENT REVIEW ORGANIZATION.
(2) THE COSTS OF A REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PAID BY THE CARRIER.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Health Care Commission, in conjunction with the Health
Services Cost Review Commission and representatives from the post–acute care industry,
shall:
(1) conduct a study to quantify bed capacity in post–acute care settings and
in hospitals in the State; and
(2) make recommendations regarding a collection and auditing process by
which hospital and post–acute beds will be reported to the Maryland Health Care
Commission or the Health Services Cost Review Commission each year.
(b) The study required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) a count of the number of physical beds within each post–acute care
facility in the State;
(2) the use of a standardized definition for each inpatient and outpatient
bed type including Adult Medical, Adult Surgical, Adult Gynecological, Adult Addictions,
Adult Obstetric, Adult Psychiatric, Adult Rehabilitation, Pediatric, Inpatient Observation,
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 165
Outpatient Observation, Observation Swing, and other types as determined jointly by the
Commissions;
(3) a count of the number of physical beds, using the standardized
definition, within each hospital in the State, by bed type;
(4) a count of the number of staffed beds, using the standardized definition,
within each post–acute care facility in the State;
(5) a count of the number of staffed beds, using the standardized definition,
within each hospital in the State, by bed type;
(6) a count of the number of licensed beds within each post–acute care
facility in the State;
(7) a count of the number of licensed beds within each hospital in the State,
by bed type;
(8) a count of the number of other types of beds as determined appropriate;
and
(9) any other information necessary for the Maryland Health Care
Commission and the Health Services Cost Review Commission to quantify bed capacity in
the State.
(c) On or before January 1, 2027, the Maryland Health Care Commission, in
conjunction with the Health Services Cost Review Commission, shall report the findings of
the study conducted under this section and its recommendation regarding the process
described in subsection (a)(2) of this section to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Health Committee.
SECTION 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Health Care Commission, in consultation with the Health
Services Cost Review Commission and representatives from the post–acute care industry,
shall conduct a study analyzing options to facilitate clinically appropriate transitions from
acute to post–acute care settings.
(b) The study conducted under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) an analysis of the factors affecting efficiency of clinically appropriate
transitions from acute to post–acute care settings;
(2) identification of potential solutions that can address the factors
analyzed under item (1) of this subsection; and
– 7 –

Ch. 165 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) any other information necessary for the Maryland Health Care
Commission or the Health Services Cost Review Commission to analyze options for
clinically appropriate transitions from acute to post–acute care settings.
(c) On or before January 1, 2027, the Maryland Health Care Commission, in
conjunction with the Health Services Cost Review Commission, shall report its findings
and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health Committee.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall take
effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 8 –